Utah statutes.
64-13-14.   Secure correctional facilities.

(1)  The department shall maintain and operate secure correctional facilities for the incarceration of offenders.

(2)  For each compound of secure correctional facilities, as established by the executive director, wardens shall be appointed as the chief administrative officers by the executive director.

(3)  The department may transfer offenders from one correctional facility to another and may, with the consent of the sheriff, transfer any offender to a county jail.



Amended by Chapter 306, 2007 General Session

